assignment2-DinhCuongLuc.foma
! Read the lexicon definition file
read lexc assignment2-DinhCuongLuc.lexc
define Lexicon;

define EInsertion [..] -> e || b | c | d | f | g | h | k | l | m | n | p | q | r | s | t | v | w | x | y | z _ "^" h i;
define LInsertion [..] -> l || a | o | u | e | i _ "^" i l;

define Cleanup "^" -> 0;

regex Lexicon         .o.
      EInsertion       .o.
      LInsertion      .o.
      Cleanup;
